Utah statutes.
26-23b-103.   Mandatory reporting requirements -- Contents of reports --
Penalties.
(1) (a)  A health care provider shall report to the department any case of any
person who the provider knows has a confirmed case of, or who the provider
believes in his professional judgment is sufficiently likely to harbor any
illness or health condition that may be caused by:
(i)  bioterrorism;
(ii)  epidemic or pandemic disease; or
(iii)  novel and highly fatal infectious agents or biological toxins which
might pose a substantial risk of a significant number of human fatalities or
incidences of permanent or long-term disability.
(b)  A health care provider shall immediately submit the report required by
Subsection (1)(a) within 24 hours of concluding that a report is required
under Subsection (1)(a).
(2) (a)  A report required by this section shall be submitted electronically,
verbally, or in writing to the department or appropriate local health
department.
(b)  A report submitted pursuant to Subsection (1) shall include, if known:
(i)  diagnostic information on the specific illness or health condition that
is the subject of the report, and, if transmitted electronically, diagnostic
codes assigned to the visit;
(ii)  the patient's name, date of birth, sex, race, occupation, and current
home and work address and phone number;
(iii)  the name, address, and phone number of the health care provider; and
(iv)  the name, address, and phone number of the reporting individual.
(3)  The department may impose a sanction against a health care provider for
failure to make a report required by this section only if the department can
show by clear and convincing evidence that a health care provider willfully
failed to file a report.
